New York, session 2025-2026, A8632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 870-p to 2 read as follows: 3 § 870-p. Minimum operator age. The commissioner shall promulgate rules 4 and regulations which shall authorize competent operators at least 5 sixteen years of age to operate all amusement devices. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03609-01-5